Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.380

Women's history consortium—Report to the legislature.

The consortium board of advisors shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2006, addressing the following:

(1) Progress on activities identified in RCW 27.34.370 and 27.34.375; and

(2) Consortium needs and plans for the future.

[ 2005 c 391 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2005 c 391: See note following RCW 27.34.360.